Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 42

Health Information Technology

25-42-101 — 25-42-106. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This chapter, concerning health information technology, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5117, effective July 1, 2019. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-42-101. Acts 2011, No. 891, § 1; 2017, No. 270, § 2.

25-42-102. Acts 2011, No. 891, § 1.

25-42-103. Acts 2011, No. 891, § 1; 2017, No. 270, § 3.

25-42-104. Acts 2011, No. 891, § 1.

25-42-105. Acts 2011, No. 891, § 1; 2017, No. 270, §§ 4, 5.

25-42-106. Acts 2011, No. 891, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 116; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 116; 2017, No. 270, §§ 6-9.

For current law, see §25-43-809 et seq.